Missouri, session 2026, HB3542.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto five new sections, to be
known as sections 1.3080, 1.3082, 1.3084, 1.3086, and 1.3088, to read as follows:
1.3080. 1. The provisions of sections 1.3080 to 1.3088 shall be known and may be
referred to as the "Community Safety and Law Enforcement Integrity Act".
2. For purposes of sections 1.3080 to 1.3088, the following terms mean:
(1) "Immigration enforcement agreement", a contract, agreement,
intergovernmental service agreement, or memorandum of understanding with the
federal government that authorizes the state, a unit of local government, a county
sheriff, or any agency, officer, employee, or agent of the state or a unit of local
government to enforce civil immigration law. Such term includes an agreement made in
accordance with 8 U.S.C. Section 1103, 8 U.S.C. Section 1357, or any other federal law;
(2) "Public funds", any funds received or controlled by the state or any agency
or political subdivision thereof including, but not limited to, funds derived from federal,
state, or local taxes, gifts or grants from any source, public or private, federal grants or
payments, or intergovernmental transfers.
3. The state, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or any agency, officer,
employee, or agent of the state or a local government shall not utilize public funds,
personnel, or facilities to assist in the investigation, detention, or arrest of individuals for
violation of any federal civil immigration law.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3542 2
1.3082. 1. The state, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or any agency,
officer, employee, or agent of the state or a unit of local government shall not enter into,
renew, or otherwise agree to be a party to an immigration enforcement agreement.
2. The state, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or any agency, officer,
employee, or agent of the state or a unit of local government with an existing
immigration enforcement agreement shall exercise the termination provision contained
in the immigration enforcement agreement immediately.
3. Any entity that violates the provisions of this section shall be liable for a civil
penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars per violation, which shall be paid into the state
treasury to the credit of the public school fund.
4. Any person harmed by an entity's violation of this section may pursue a civil
action against such entity to seek injunctive relief or recover damages.
1.3084. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any federal law
enforcement agent performing Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE)
operations in this state shall visibly display identification that includes the agent's
affiliation with ICE and the agent's name or badge number, or both, while performing
official duties. Such agents shall not wear facial coverings that conceal or obscure their
facial identity in the performance of official duties, except as expressly authorized in this
section.
2. For purposes of this section, "facial covering" means any opaque mask,
garment, helmet, headgear, or other item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of
an individual including, but not limited to, a balaclava, tactical mask, gaiter, ski mask,
and any similar type of facial covering or face-shielding item. A facial covering does not
include any of the following:
(1) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not conceal or obscure the
wearer's facial identity;
(2) An N95 medical mask or surgical mask worn to protect against transmission
of disease or infection, or any other mask, helmet, or device including, but not limited to,
air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained breathing apparatus
necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, gas, smoke, inclement weather, or
any other hazardous or harmful environmental condition;
(3) A mask, helmet, or device including, but not limited to, a self-contained
breathing apparatus, necessary for underwater use;
(4) A motorcycle helmet when worn by an agent utilizing a motorcycle or other
vehicle that requires a helmet for safe operation while in the performance of their
duties; or

HB 3542 3
(5) Eyewear necessary to protect from the use of retinal weapons including, but
not limited to, lasers.
3. This section shall not apply to:
(1) Agents performing their duties as undercover operatives during an active
undercover operation or as needed to protect their identity following the conclusion of
an undercover operation; or
(2) Agents assigned to a Special Response Team (SRT) while actively performing
their SRT responsibilities.
4. A willful and knowing violation of this section is punishable as a class A
misdemeanor.
1.3086. Any federal law enforcement agent performing Immigration and
Customs Enforcement (ICE) operations in this state shall be required to present a valid
judicial warrant signed by a judge prior to entering a private residence or nonpublic
area of a business. Any agent who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject
to the state trespass laws under chapter 569.
1.3088. 1. Unless presented with a valid judicial warrant signed by a judge, no
jail administrator or employee of a jail shall disclose to any federal agent performing
Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) operations in this state any information
relating to an offender's release date.
2. Any person who reveals information in violation of subsection 1 of this section
shall be subject to disciplinary action, including a thirty-day suspension in pay, and shall
be subject to a five-thousand-dollar fine, which shall be paid into the state treasury to
the credit of the public school fund.
✔